Utah statutes.
67-19-3.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Agency" means any department or unit of Utah state government with
authority to employ personnel.
(2)  "Career service" means positions under schedule B as defined in Section
67-19-15.
(3)  "Career service employee" means an employee who has successfully
completed a probationary period of service in a position covered by the career
service.
(4)  "Career service status" means status granted to employees who
successfully complete probationary periods for competitive career service
positions.
(5)  "Classified service" means those positions subject to the classification
and compensation provisions of Section 67-19-12.
(6)  "Controlled substance" means controlled substance as defined in Section
58-37-2.
(7) (a)  "Demotion" means a disciplinary action resulting in a reduction of an
employee's current actual wage.
(b)  "Demotion" does not mean:
(i)  a nondisciplinary movement of an employee to another position without a
reduction in the current actual wage; or
(ii)  a reclassification of an employee's position under the provisions of
Subsection 67-19-12(3) and rules made by the department.
(8)  "Department" means the Department of Human Resource Management.
(9)  "Disability" means a physical or mental disability as defined and
protected under the Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101
et seq.
(10)  "Employee" means any individual in a paid status covered by the career
service or classified service provisions of this chapter.
(11)  "Examining instruments" means written or other types of proficiency
tests.
(12)  "Executive director," except where otherwise specified, means the
executive director of the Department of Human Resource Management.
(13)  "Human resource function" means those duties and responsibilities
specified:
(a)  under Section 67-19-6;
(b)  under rules of the department; and
(c)  under other state or federal statute.
(14)  "Market comparability adjustment" means a salary range adjustment
determined necessary through a market survey of salary ranges of a reasonable
cross section of comparable benchmark positions in private and public
employment.
(15)  "Probationary employee" means an employee serving a probationary period
in a career service position but who does not have career service status.
(16)  "Probationary period" means that period of time determined by the
department that an employee serves in a career service position as part of the
hiring process before career service status is granted to the employee.
(17)  "Probationary status" means the status of an employee between the
employee's hiring and the granting of career service status.
(18)  "Temporary employee" means career service exempt employees on schedule
IN or TL under Section 67-19-15.
(19)  "Total compensation" means salaries and wages, bonuses, paid leave,
group insurance plans, retirement, and all other benefits offered to state
employees as inducements to work for the state.
